apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="খাপ /খা__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেনা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেও</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেওনা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাস</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাসনে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেন</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেননা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেনা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেন</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেননা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেনা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাব</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবনা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেনা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবি</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবিনা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেন</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেননা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেনা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেন</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবেননা</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাওয়া</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেতে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাবার</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেয়েছিল</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খায়নি</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেয়েছিলাম</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাইনি</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেয়েছিলে</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাওনি</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেয়েছিলি</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাসনি</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেয়েছিলেন</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খাননি</l>
          <r>খা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>খেয়েছিল</l>

    <e lm="খাপ খা"><i>খাপ </i><par n="খাপ /খা__vblex"/></e>
